Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) There  is appropriated to the Department of Transportation, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $18,371,940  for debt
service on the State Radio Project and highway improvement projects.
(2) There is appropriated to the Department of  Transportation, for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $14,400,000 for expenses related  to
debris removal associated with the 2020 wildfire season.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and fed-
eral funds received as reimbursement from the United States Department  of Transportation,
but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in this section, collected or re-
ceived by the Department of Transportation, for the following purposes:
(1) Capital improvement............. $ 18,099,880
(2) Maintenance and emergency
relief programs ..................... $ 744,121,732
(3) Preservation program ........... $ 446,173,142
(4) Bridge program..................... $ 494,371,408
(5) Operations program .............. $ 435,669,414
(6) Modernization program......... $ 141,646,624
(7) Special programs................... $ 537,365,821
(8) Local government program ... $ 303,079,658
(9) Driver and motor vehicle
services ................................. $ 256,458,783
(10) Commerce and compliance ... $ 77,673,013
(11) Policy, data and analysis ...... $ 194,455,898
(12) Public transit ........................ $ 258,808,502
(13) Rail........................................ $ 51,398,601
(14) Transportation safety ........... $ 17,949,645
(15) Support services ................... $ 179,751,268
Enrolled Senate Bill 5542 (SB 5542-A) Page 1
(16) ODOT headquarters.............. $ 61,914,340
(17) Finance and budget............... $ 52,429,763
(18) Debt service .......................... $ 400,357,130
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds other than those described  in section 2 of this 2021 Act, col-
lected or received by the Department of Transportation, for the following purposes:
(1) Driver and motor
vehicle services ..................... $ 2,204,752
(2) Commerce and compliance ... $ 8,000,000
(3) Policy, data and analysis ...... $ 201,769
(4) Public transit ........................ $ 76,886,503
(5) Rail........................................ $ 17,122,916
(6) Transportation safety ........... $ 21,270,051
(7) Finance and budget............... $ 317,204
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$125,155,188 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Department of Transportation for debt service.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $300,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses by the Department of Transportation from  lottery moneys allocated from the
Veterans’ Services Fund established  under ORS 406.140 to the Department of Veterans’ Af-
fairs and transferred to the Department of Transportation for veteran transit services.
SECTION 6.
For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, expenditures  by the Department
of Transportation from federal funds for debt service  on Build America Bonds are not lim-
ited.
SECTION 7. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, expenditures  by the Department
of Transportation from the Oregon  Transportation Infrastructure Fund established under
ORS 367.015 for debt service and for internally reimbursed expenditures are not limited.
SECTION 8. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5542 (SB 5542-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 7, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 10, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5542 (SB 5542-A) Page 3